Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska57-609
Abandonment by condemner of underground reservoir; reversion of property to landowner.

When the condemner shall have permanently abandoned the entire underground storage reservoir for storing natural gas or liquefied petroleum gas, title to that sand, formation, or stratum which had been appropriated under the terms of sections 57-601 to 57-609 shall revert to the then owners of the land, mineral and royalty interests in proportion to their several ownerships.

Laws 1963, c. 325, § 8, p. 988.